Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.035

Inventory and appraisement may be contradicted or avoided.

In an action against the personal representative where the administration of the estate, or any part thereof, is put in issue and the inventory and appraisement of the estate by the personal representative is given in evidence, the same may be contradicted or avoided by evidence. Any party in interest in the estate may challenge the inventory and appraisement at any stage of the probate proceedings.

[ 1997 c 252 s 43; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.035. Prior: Code 1881 s 721; 1877 p 146 s 725; 1869 p 166 s 662; RCW 11.48.170; RRS s 970.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.